Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.505.070

Budget review committee—Members—Review of budget, limitations.

The budget review committee shall fix and approve the amount of the appropriation from each fund of the budget of second-class districts not later than August 31st. No budget review committee shall knowingly approve any budget or appropriation that is in violation of this chapter or rules and regulations adopted by the superintendent of public instruction in accordance with RCW 28A.505.140(1). A copy of said budget shall be returned to the local school districts no later than September 10th.

Members of the budget review committee as referred to in this section shall consist of the educational service district superintendent or a representative thereof, a member of the local school district board of directors or a representative thereof, and a representative of the superintendent of public instruction.

[ 1990 c 33 s 419; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 7. Formerly RCW 28A.65.430.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118: See note following RCW 28A.505.010.